Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,163
Fees; distribution.

Every health maintenance organization subject to the Health Maintenance Organization Act shall pay to the director the following fees:

(1) For filing an application for a certificate of authority or amendment thereto, three hundred dollars;

(2) For filing an amendment to the organizational documents that requires approval, twenty dollars;

(3) For filing each annual report, two hundred dollars; and

(4) For renewing a certificate of authority, one hundred dollars.

Fees charged under this section shall be distributed one-half to the Director of Insurance and one-half to the Department of Health and Human Services. All fees or other assessments transmitted to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to the act shall be remitted to the state treasury for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. There shall be appropriated from money credited to the fund pursuant to this section such amounts as are available to pay expenses considered incident to the administration of the act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 72;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 255;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 194.